Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Offenses by Public Officials

Cross references. —

As to sports bribery, see §

6-3-609

.

For constitutional provision that the legislature shall punish members for bribery and that such punishment shall not be a bar to criminal prosecution for the same offense, see art. 3, § 12, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to bribery of legislators and solicitation of bribery, and as to expulsion of legislators for bribery or solicitation, see art. 3, § 42, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to offer to bribe, see art. 3, § 43, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to witnesses in bribery charges, see art. 3, § 44, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that legislature shall define corrupt solicitation and provide punishment therefor, see art. 3, § 45, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to bribery or coercion of or by the governor, see art. 4, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to bribery of horse racing officials, see §

11-25-109

.

As to offering a bribe as an offense under the Election Code, see §

22-26-109

.

As to accepting a bribe as an offense under the Election Code, see §

22-26-110

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When statute of limitations begins to run against criminal prosecution for embezzlement, fraud, false pretenses, or similar crimes, 77 ALR3d 689.

Where is embezzlement committed for purposes of territorial jurisdiction or venue, 80 ALR3d 514.

Embezzlement, larceny, false pretenses, or allied criminal fraud by a partner, 82 ALR3d 822.

Venue in bribery cases where crime is committed partly in one county and partly in another, 11 ALR4th 704.

§ 6-5-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Government” includes any branch, subdivision or agency of the state of Wyoming or any city, town, county, school district or special district within it;

“Governmental function” includes any activity which a public servant is legally authorized to undertake on behalf of a government;

“Harm” means loss, disadvantage or injury;

“Pecuniary benefit” is benefit in the form of property;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 82 § 2.

“Public officer” means a person who holds an office which is created or granted authority by the constitution or the legislature and who exercises a portion of the sovereign power of the state;

“Public servant” means any public officer, employee of government, or any person participating, as juror, witness, advisor, consultant or otherwise, in performing a governmental function.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2015 ch. 82, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

For an exception to the definition of “pecuniary benefit” in this section, see §

6-5-118

.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, at the end of the introductory language of (a)(iv), deleted “but does not include”;
repealed former (a)(iv)(A) through (a)(iv)(C), pertaining to property not included in “pecuniary benefit”; substituted “public officer, employee of government, or” for “officer or employee of government, including legislators and judges, and”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a)(iv)(B), appears as 26 U.S.C.

Constitutionality. —

Section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to defendant where the facts of the case did not demonstrate arbitrary or discriminatory enforcement of the section in that the jury concluded that defendant was a public servant performing a governmental function while another jury might have concluded otherwise. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Section is not unconstitutionally vague because it adequately specifies the standard of conduct it proscribes; the section clearly specifies that the offense of bribery is committed when a public servant solicits, accepts or agrees to accept pecuniary benefit or personal advantage upon an agreement or understanding that his action as a public servant will be influenced thereby. The standard of conduct proscribed is the agreement or acceptance that the public servant's actions will be influenced by the promises of pecuniary benefit or personal advantage; the definition of public servant contained in the preceding provision provides adequate notice that any person participating in a legally authorized act on behalf of a government is subject to penalty for violating the statute; the statute is not so vague as to specify no standard of conduct at all. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Defendant was a “public servant.” —

Defendant was a public servant performing a governmental function at the time he solicited and accepted ‘persuasion money’ from a minor's mother, as required by this section, because defendant, as an employee of the counseling agency, was participating in court-ordered treatment of the minor resulting from his involvement in the juvenile justice system. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is public official within meaning of federal statute punishing bribery of public official (18 U.S.C. § 201), 161 ALR Fed 491.

§ 6-5-102.
Bribery; penalties.

A person commits bribery, if:

He offers, confers or agrees to confer any pecuniary benefit, testimonial, privilege or personal advantage upon a public servant as consideration for the public servant’s vote, exercise of discretion or other action in his official capacity; or

While a public servant, he solicits, accepts or agrees to accept any pecuniary benefit, testimonial, privilege or personal advantage upon an agreement or understanding that his vote, exercise of discretion or other action as a public servant will thereby be influenced.

Bribery is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

Section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to defendant where the facts of the case did not demonstrate arbitrary or discriminatory enforcement of the section in that the jury concluded that he was a public servant performing a governmental function while another jury might have concluded otherwise. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Section is not unconstitutionally vague because it adequately specifies the standard of conduct it proscribes; the section clearly specifies that the offense of bribery is committed when a public servant solicits, accepts or agrees to accept pecuniary benefit or personal advantage upon an agreement or understanding that his action as a public servant will be influenced thereby. The standard of conduct proscribed is the agreement or acceptance that the public servant's actions will be influenced by the promises of pecuniary benefit or personal advantage; the definition of public servant contained in the preceding provision provides adequate notice that any person participating in a legally authorized act on behalf of a government is subject to penalty for violating the statute; the statute is not so vague as to specify no standard of conduct at all. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Plea arguments. —

The statute does not preclude the use of plea agreements. Mazurek v. State, 10 P.3d 531,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2000); Capshaw v. State, 10 P.3d 560,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2000).

Wyoming law does not require evidence of bilateral agreement

between the briber and the bribee; the phrase “as consideration for” does not require proof that an alleged briber offered a pecuniary benefit pursuant to an agreement by the alleged bribee to reciprocate in some illicit manner. United States v. Davis, 965 F.2d 804, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 15391 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, 507 U.S. 910, 113 S. Ct. 1255, 122 L. Ed. 2d 653, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 1126 (U.S. 1993).

Habeas petition was untimely. —

State prisoner's Fed. R. Civ. P. 60(b)(1) motion was properly denied because the record made clear that his § 2254 petition was not timely filed under 28 U.S.C.S. § 2244(d) in that the district court properly included the entire time from the filing of the state postconviction motion to the eventual denial of certiorari of his conviction for bribery under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-102(a). An additional 45-days of statutory tolling was not required because the prisoner's appeal of the denial of postconviction relief was not the procedurally proper manner to seek review pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-14-107

and Wyo. R. App. P. 13.01(a).
Stanton v. Wyoming Ag,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 21199

(Oct. 14, 2010).

Evidence held sufficient. —

Evidence that the defendant had bribed a public official in hopes of obtaining more favorable regulations of the insurance business was held sufficient to support a conviction under this section. United States v. Davis, 965 F.2d 804, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 15391 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, 507 U.S. 910, 113 S. Ct. 1255, 122 L. Ed. 2d 653, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 1126 (U.S. 1993).

Defendant was a public servant performing a governmental function at the time he solicited and accepted ‘persuasion money’ from a minor's mother, as required by this section, because defendant, as an employee of the counseling agency, was participating in court-ordered treatment of the minor resulting from his involvement in the juvenile justice system. Stanton v. State, 2006 WY 31, 130 P.3d 486,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of evidence tending to show other bribery or acceptance of bribes,
20 ALR2d 1012.

Solicitation or receipt of funds by public officer or employee for political campaign expenses or similar purposes as bribery, 55 ALR2d 1137.

Entrapment to commit bribery or offer to bribe, 69 ALR2d 1397.

Criminal liability of corporation for bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official, 52 ALR3d 1274.

Furnishing public official with meals, lodging or travel, or receipt of such benefits, as bribery, 67 ALR3d 1231.

Whether lack of authority of state public officer or employee to perform the act for which the bribe was offered affects the criminal offense of bribery, 73 ALR3d 374.

Who is public official within meaning of federal statute punishing bribery of public official (18 U.S.C. § 201), 161 ALR Fed 491.

§ 6-5-103.
Compensation for past official behavior; penalties.

A person commits an offense if he solicits, accepts or agrees to accept any pecuniary benefit as compensation for having, as a public servant, given a decision or vote favorable to another, or for having otherwise exercised a discretion in his favor, or for having violated his statutory duties. For purposes of this section, “compensation” does not include mere acceptance of an offer of employment.

Compensation for past official behavior is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cited

in

Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-104.
Soliciting unlawful compensation; penalties.

A public servant commits soliciting unlawful compensation if he solicits, accepts or agrees to accept a pecuniary benefit for the performance of an official action knowing that he was required to perform that action without compensation or at a level of compensation lower than that requested.

Soliciting unlawful compensation is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-105.
Unlawful designation of provider of services or goods; penalties; affirmative defense.

No public servant shall require or direct a bidder or contractor to deal with a particular person in procuring any goods or service required in submitting a bid to or fulfilling a contract with any government.

A provision in an invitation to bid or a contract document which violates this section is against public policy and voidable.

It is an affirmative defense that the defendant was a public servant acting within the scope of his authority exercising the right to reject any material, subcontractor, service, bond or contract tendered by a bidder or contractor because it did not meet bona fide specifications or requirements relating to quality, availability, experience or financial responsibility.

A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (d), substituted “A violation of this section” for “Designating a supplier.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-106.
Conflict of interest; penalties; disclosure of interest and withdrawal from participation.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, a public servant commits an offense if he requests or receives any pecuniary benefit, other than lawful compensation, on any contract, or for the letting of any contract, or making any appointment where the government employing or subject to the discretion or decisions of the public servant is concerned.

If any public servant discloses the nature and extent of his pecuniary interest to all parties concerned therewith and does not participate during the considerations and vote thereon and does not attempt to influence any of the parties and does not act for the governing body with respect to the contracts or appointments, then the acts are not unlawful under subsection (a) of this section. Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to the operation, administration, inspection or performance of banking and deposit contracts or relationships after the selection of a depository.

Violation of subsection (a) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision relative to interest of officer in contracts for supplies for legislature and departments, see art. 3, § 31, Wyo. Const.

As to other statutory provision relative to interest of officers in public contracts or public works, see §

16-6-118

.

Conflicting action nullified unless subsection (b) compliedwith. —

A person is not disqualified from holding an office or position that conflicts with other interests of that person if he complies with the requirements of the provisos of subsection (b). Otherwise, the contract or other action is a nullity and the person is subject to criminal prosecution. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Qualified exception to prohibition did not eliminate questionof incompatibility. —

While the legislature intended to permit a qualified exception to conflict of interest prohibitions by amending former conflict of interest statute and §

16-6-118

, it would be an unwarranted construction of the amendatory legislation to hold that it had eliminated any question of incompatibility. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973) (commented on in IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974)).

Incompatibility between office of member of board of trustees of a school district and employment as teacher in that district was not eliminated by qualified exception to conflict of interest prohibitions. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973) (commented on in IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974)).

Spouse as school trustee compatible with spouse as school employee.—

Husband and wife do not constitute a single entity for the purpose of incompatibility of office and position which will prevent one of them, as trustee of a school district, from exercising impartial and independent judgment in the public interest on a matter in which the other is involved as an employee of the district. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Contract with coroner to supply medicine and medical attendance to paupers

of the county was not a contract within the provisions of the conflict of interest statute, though the office of coroner was a lucrative office. Baker v. Board of Comm'rs, 9 Wyo. 51, 59 P. 797,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1900).

Quo warranto remedy inapplicable. —

Where the legislature has recognized the existence of conflicts of interest and has directed the procedure and remedies applicable thereto, the remedy of quo warranto is inapplicable. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Conflict of Interest — Legal Interests vs. Relational Interests. Coyne v. State ex rel. Thomas, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979),” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 349 (1980).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of enactments requiring public officers to disclose financial condition and relationships, 37 ALR3d 1338.

§ 6-5-107.
Official misconduct; penalties.

A public servant commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), if, with intent to obtain a pecuniary benefit or maliciously to cause harm to another, he knowingly:

Commits an act relating to his official duties that the public servant does not have the authority to undertake;

Refrains from performing a duty imposed upon him by law; or

Violates any statute relating to his official duties.

A public officer commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) if he intentionally fails to perform a duty in the manner and within the time prescribed by law.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “or public officer” following “public servant”; rewrote (a)(i), which formerly read: “Commits an unauthorized act relating to his official duties.”

Cited in

Bohling v. State, 2017 WY 7, 388 P.3d 502,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Town of Upton v. Whisler, 824 P.2d 545,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-108.
Issuing false certificate; penalties.

A public servant commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if he makes and issues an official certificate or other official written instrument which he is authorized to make and issue containing a statement which he knows to be false with intent to obtain a benefit or maliciously to cause harm to another.

A public servant commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if he makes and issues an official certificate or other official written instrument which he is authorized to make and issue containing a statement which he knows to be false.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

As to notary acting after term expires, see §

32-1-109

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to larceny, see §

6-3-402

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to embezzlement of public property.

§ 6-5-110.
Wrongful appropriation of public property; penalties.

A public servant who lawfully or unlawfully comes into possession of any property of any government and who, with intent temporarily to deprive the owner of its use and benefit, converts any of the public property to his own use or any use other than the public use authorized by law is guilty of wrongful appropriation of public property.

Wrongful appropriation is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

This section shall not apply to limited use of government property or resources for personal purposes if the use does not interfere with the performance of a governmental function and either the cost or value related to the use is de minimis or the public servant reimburses the government for the cost of the use.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

For provision that no warrant shall be drawn by the auditor or paid by the treasurer unless funds have been previously appropriated for that purpose, see §

9-2-1005

.

For provision prohibiting state officers from creating expenses in excess of appropriation, see §

9-4-102

.

For provision that city treasurer shall keep all moneys belonging to the city separate and distinct from their own and not directly or indirectly use the city money for his own use and benefit, see §

15-3-210

.

As to misappropriation by county treasurer of funds derived from the sale of bonds, see §

18-4-506

.

As to penalty for misappropriation of school bond funds by trustees, see §

21-13-716

.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added (c).

Cited

in

State v. Faulkner, 75 Wyo. 104, 292 P.2d 1045,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1956); Bohling v. State, 2017 WY 7, 388 P.3d 502,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-111.
Failure or refusal to account for, deliver or pay over property; penalties.

A public servant who fails or refuses to account for, deliver and pay over property received by virtue of the office, when legally required by the proper person or authority is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provision that failure to account for money paid into and disbursed by the circuit court constitutes misconduct and cause for removal from office, see §

5-9-148

.

For provision requiring each circuit court to submit annual accounts to the director, see §

5-9-151

.

For provision requiring each state officer and employee receiving revenue on behalf of the state to pay to the state treasurer all such revenue, see §

9-1-409

.

For provision that all outgoing officials shall deliver all public records to their successors, see §

9-2-410

.

As to town treasurers' accounts, see §

15-2-203

.

For provision that failure of the city treasurer to render his account as cause for removal from office, see §

15-3-208

.

As to the city treasurer keeping accounts of all monies received, see §

15-3-209

.

For provision that violation of requirement that city treasurer keep city funds separate from his own funds shall subject him to removal from office, see §

15-3-210

.

For provision requiring sheriff to be accountable for monies and property coming into his office, see §

18-3-609

.

For provision requiring all county officials to pay over monies received to the county treasurer, and for penalty for failure to do so, see §

18-3-814

.

Larceny and failure to account merge. —

Where evidence of embezzlement by larceny is also evidence used to support the charge of a public official's failure to account, these offenses have merged. Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. Nov. 7, 1988).

Demand for the money is required

under the provisions of this section. Edelhoff v. State, 5 Wyo. 19, 36 P. 627,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1894).

Demand for money not required. —

Any public office having regular responsibility for the receipt of public funds within the purview of this section is legally required to account as a designated responsibility of the position held, and further demand is not required. Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. Nov. 7, 1988).

Presumption that funds collected by officer. —

In an embezzlement prosecution against a clerk of the district court, required to collect fees, it must be presumed the clerk performed that duty and had monies to account for. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Roberts v. Board of County Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1899); State v. Faulkner, 75 Wyo. 104, 292 P.2d 1045,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1956); Western Sur. Co. v. Town of Evansville, 675 P.2d 258,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-112.
Mistreating persons in institutions or mental hospital; penalties; no bar to other criminal action.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, if he:

Is an employee of, or is responsible for the care of a person in, a reformatory, penal or charitable institution or a mental hospital and treats him with unnecessary severity, harshness or cruelty; or

Is an officer required by law to perform an act with regard to persons in a reformatory, penal or charitable institution or a mental hospital and he intentionally refuses or neglects to perform the act.

This section does not bar prosecution, under any other criminal statute, of a person responsible for the care of a person in a reformatory, penal or charitable institution or a mental hospital, even if he also violates this section.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to rights of patients in hospitals for the mentally ill, see §

25-10-120

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of state prison authorities to administer neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs to prisoner without his or her consent—state cases, 75 ALR4th 1124.

Validity under federal law of prison regulations relating to inmates' hair length and style, 62 ALR Fed 479.

§ 6-5-113.
Removal from office after judgment of conviction.

A judgment of conviction rendered under W.S.

6-5-102

through

6-5-112

and

6-5-117

against any public servant, except state elected officials, supreme court justices, district court judges and circuit court judges, shall result in removal from office or discharge from employment.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes conviction within statutory or constitutional provision making conviction of crime ground of disqualification for removal from, or vacancy in, public office, 10 ALR5th 139.

§ 6-5-114.
Notarial officers; issuance of certificate without proper acknowledgment; penalties.

A notarial officer commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he signs and affixes his stamp to a certificate of acknowledgment when the party executing the instrument has not first acknowledged the execution of the instrument in the presence of, as defined in W.S. 32-3-102(a)(iii), the notarial officer, if by law the instrument is required to be recorded or filed and cannot be filed without a certificate of acknowledgment signed and sealed by a notarial officer.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2011, ch. 113, § 2; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

As to acknowledgment of conveyances, see §

34-1-113

.

As to acknowledgment when conveyance is to be recorded, see §

34-1-118

.

For Wyoming Uniform Law on Notarial Acts, see § 34-26-101 et seq.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” throughout, and “in the presence of, as defined in W.S. 34-26-101(b)(xxi)” for “before.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "stamp" for "seal" following "affixes his" and "32-3-102(a)(iii)" and "34-26-101(b)(xxi)."

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-115.
Neglect or refusal of ministerial officer to perform duty in criminal case; unnecessary delay in serving warrant; penalties.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or both, if he is:

A clerk, sheriff, coroner or other ministerial officer who refuses or neglects to perform any duty he is required by law to perform in any criminal case or proceeding; or

An officer who unnecessarily delays serving a warrant legally issued in any criminal case when it is his duty to execute and in his power to serve the warrant.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sufficiency of indictment. —

See McCarthy v. Territory, 1 Wyo. 311,

1876 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1876).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-116.
Public officer acting before qualifying; penalty.

An elected or appointed public officer or his deputy commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) if he performs any duty of his office without taking and subscribing the oath prescribed by law or before giving and filing the bond required by law. This section shall not apply to training and similar minor preparation for taking office.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added the last sentence.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a conviction of performing duties of office before qualifying, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-116

(2013) where a sheriff’s statutory duties pertaining to municipal fiscal procedures qualified as any duty of his office under §

6-5-116

, and the witness testimony showed that defendant had performed a sheriff’s duty by purchasing uniforms and that the purchase occurred before defendant was sworn in. Haskell v. State, 2018 WY 85, 422 P.3d 955,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 6-5-117.
Public officer demanding kickback from deputy; penalties.

A public officer who requires a deputy appointed by him to divide or pay back to the officer a part of the deputy’s salary or requires any type of compensation of any form in return for the deputy’s continued employment is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “deputy's salary or requires any type of compensation of any form in return for the deputy's continued employment” for “legal fees of the deputy.”

Cross references. —

As to blackmail generally, see §

6-2-402

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes offense of official oppression, 83 ALR2d 1007.

§ 6-5-118.
Conflict of interest; public investments; disclosure required; penalty; definitions.

No public servant who invests public funds for a unit of government, or who has authority to decide how public funds are invested, shall transact any personal business with, receive any pecuniary benefit from or have any financial interest in any entity, other than a governmental entity, unless he has disclosed the benefit or interest in writing to the body of which he is a member or entity for which he is working. Disclosures shall be made annually in a public meeting and shall be made part of the record of proceedings. The public servant shall make the written disclosure prior to investing any public funds in any entity, other than a governmental entity, which:

Provides any services related to investment of funds by that same unit of government; or

Has a financial interest in any security or other investment made by that unit of government.

A violation of subsection (a) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

The definitions in W.S.

6-5-101

shall apply to this section except “pecuniary benefit” shall also include benefits in the form of services such as, but not limited to, transportation and lodging. As used in this section, “personal business” means any activity that is not a governmental function as defined in W.S.

6-5-101

(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 3, § 1; 2015 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “public officer or” preceding “public servant” near the beginning of the first and second sentences.